Maryland, session 2026, SB0896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–912.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every passenger car and station
wagon, except as otherwise provided in this part, is a Class A (passenger) vehicle.
(b) For each Class A (passenger) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0896*

SENATE BILL 896
(1) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of [3,500] 3,700
pounds or less[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $70.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $80.50], $50.50; AND
(2) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than
[3,500 pounds but not more than] 3,700 pounds[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $80.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $85.50; and
(3) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,700
pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $121.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $151.50], $76.50.
13–913.
(a) (1) When registered with the Administration, every passenger motor
vehicle operated for the transportation of persons for hire, except a vehicle described in
paragraph (2) of this subsection, is a Class B (for hire) vehicle.
(2) The following vehicles are not subject to the classification specified in
this section:
(i) Any vehicle operated on a regular schedule and between fixed
termini; and
(ii) Any vehicle for which a different classification is specified in this
part.
(b) For each Class B (for hire) vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $170.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $180.00] $150.00.
13–914.

SENATE BILL 896 3
(a) When registered with the Administration, every motor vehicle operated as an
ambulance, a mortician flower coach or service wagon, or a funeral limousine or coach is a
Class C (funeral and ambulance) vehicle.
(b) For each Class C (funeral and ambulance) vehicle, the annual registration fee
is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $120.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $130.00] $100.00.
13–915.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every motorcycle is a Class D
(motorcycle) vehicle.
(b) For each Class D (motorcycle) vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $55.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $65.00] $35.00.
13–916.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every single unit truck with two or
more axles is a Class E (truck) vehicle.
(b) [(1)] For each Class E (truck) vehicle, the annual registration fee is based on
the maximum gross weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles, as follows:
Maximum Gross Weight Fee (per 1,000 Pounds
Limit (in Pounds) or Fraction Thereof)
10,000 (minimum) – 18,000 $9.00
18,001 – 26,000 11.75
26,001 – 40,000 12.75
40,001 – 60,000 14.75
60,001 – 80,000 (maximum) 16.00
[(2) (i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the annual
registration fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $45.00.
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $75.00.]
13–917.

SENATE BILL 896
Notwithstanding § 13–916(b) of this subtitle, for any Class E (truck) vehicle [with a
manufacturer’s rated capacity of 3/4 ton or less and a maximum gross vehicle weight of
7,000 pounds or less], the annual registration fee is $63.75 IF:
(1) [For a vehicle with a] THE MANUFACTURER’S RATED CAPACITY IS
3/4 TON OR LESS; AND
(2) THE maximum gross vehicle weight [of 3,500] IS 7,000 pounds or less[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75;
(2) Except as provided in item (4) of this section, for a vehicle with a
maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 3,500 pounds but not more than 5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $93.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $98.75;
(3) Except as provided in item (4) of this section, for a vehicle with a
maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $108.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $138.75; and
(4) For a vehicle, regardless of the vehicle’s maximum gross vehicle weight,
for which the owner certifies on the registration application that the vehicle for which the
application is made will be used for construction activities:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75].
13–919.
(a) On application, the Administration shall issue a special Class E “dump service
registration” to any applicant who certifies that the vehicle for which the application is
made is a Class E (truck) vehicle that:
(1) Is designed to haul cargo and to self–unload by gravity or mechanical
means; and
(2) Is to be used to haul feed or other loose materials in bulk.

SENATE BILL 896 5
(f) For each vehicle registered under this section, the annual registration fee is
the greater of:
(1) [On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025:
(i)] $26.25 for each thousand pounds of gross weight of the vehicle
[plus an additional $20.00]; or
[(ii) $1,070.00; and]
(2) [On or after July 1, 2025:
(i) $26.25 for each thousand pounds of gross weight of the vehicle
plus an additional $30.00; or
(ii) $1,080.00] $1,050.00.
13–920.
(a) (1) In this section, “tow truck” means a vehicle that:
(i) Is a Class E (truck) vehicle that is designed to lift, pull, or carry
a vehicle by a hoist or mechanical apparatus;
(ii) Has a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000
pounds or more; and
(iii) Is equipped as a tow truck or designed as a rollback as defined in
§ 11–151.1 of this article.
(2) In this section, “tow truck” does not include a truck tractor as defined
in § 11–172 of this article.
(b) When registered with the Administration every tow truck as defined in this
section is a Class T vehicle.
(c) A tow truck registered under this section may be used to tow vehicles for
repair, storage, or removal from the highway.
(d) (1) [(i)] Subject to the provisions of [subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph
and] paragraph (2) of this subsection, for each vehicle registered under this section, the
annual registration fee is based on the manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating as
follows:
Manufacturer’s Gross Weight Fee
Rating in Pounds

SENATE BILL 896
10,000 (or less) to 26,000 $185.00
More than 26,000 $550.00
[(ii) 1. On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the
annual registration fee under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph is increased by an
additional $20.00.
2. On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph is increased by an additional $30.00.]
(2) (i) The annual registration fee for a vehicle registered under this
section that is used for any purpose other than that described in subsection (c) of this
section shall be determined under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph if the maximum
gross weight of the vehicle or combination of vehicles:
1. Exceeds 18,000 pounds and the vehicle has a
manufacturer’s gross weight rating of 26,000 pounds or less; or
2. Exceeds 35,000 pounds and the vehicle has a
manufacturer’s gross weight rating of more than 26,000 pounds.
(ii) The annual registration fee shall be the greater of:
1. The fees set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection; or
2. The fees set forth in § 13–916(b) of this subtitle.
13–923.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every truck tractor or similar motor
vehicle used for propelling, supporting, or drawing a trailer or semitrailer is a Class F
(tractor) vehicle.
(b) [(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for] FOR each Class F
(tractor) vehicle, the annual registration fee is based on the maximum gross weight of the
vehicle in combination with a trailer or semitrailer, as follows:
Maximum Gross Weight Fee (per 1,000 Pounds
Limit (in Pounds) or Fraction Thereof)
40,000 (minimum) – 60,000 $21.00
60,001 – 80,000 or more $22.50
[(2) (i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the annual
registration fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $20.00.
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $30.00.]

SENATE BILL 896 7
13–927.
(d) The annual registration fee for a Class G (trailer) vehicle is based on the
maximum gross weight as follows:
(1) [(i)] Except as provided in item (2) of this subsection [and subject to
item (ii) of this item], for a nonfreight trailer or semitrailer:
Maximum Gross Weight
Limit (in Pounds) Fee
3,000 or less $25.50
3,001 to 5,000 51.00
5,001 to 10,000 80.00
10,001 to 20,000 124.00
[(ii) 1. On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the
annual registration fee under item (i) of this item is increased by an additional $20.00; and
2. On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
item (i) of this item is increased by an additional $30.00;]
(2) For a nonfreight trailer or semitrailer with a maximum gross weight
limit (in pounds) of 10,001 to 20,000 that is titled on or after October 1, 2005:
(i) The fee is[:
1. On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $144.00;
and
2. On or after July 1, 2025, $154.00] $124.00; and
(ii) The vehicle shall be registered in one of the following weight
ranges:
Maximum Gross Weight
Limit (in Pounds)
10,001 to 11,000
11,001 to 12,000
12,001 to 13,000
13,001 to 14,000
14,001 to 15,000
15,001 to 16,000
16,001 to 17,000
17,001 to 18,000
18,001 to 19,000

SENATE BILL 896
19,001 to 20,000
(3) For a freight trailer or semitrailer the fee is[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $58.25; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $68.25] $38.25.
13–932.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every school vehicle is a Class H
(school) vehicle.
(b) For each Type I school vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) If the vehicle is a school bus only operated for the transportation of
children, students, or teachers for educational purposes or in connection with a school
activity or, with approval from a board of education in any county, to provide transportation
for persons 60 years of age or older to civic, educational, social, or recreational activities[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $71.00; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $81.00], $51.00; and
(2) If the vehicle is a school bus charter operated for any purpose in
addition to that specified in item (1) of this subsection [:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $170.00],
$150.00, less any amount paid under item (1) of this subsection[; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $180.00, less any amount paid under
item (1) of this subsection].
(c) For each Type II school vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $71.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $81.00] $51.00.
13–933.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every bus operated under charter
or for hire is a Class P (passenger bus) vehicle.

SENATE BILL 896 9
(b) [(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for] FOR each Class P
(passenger bus) vehicle, the annual registration fee is based on the seating capacity of the
bus, as follows:
Seating Capacity Fee
20 or less $275.00
21 to 35 525.00
36 or more 875.00
[(2) (i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, the annual
registration fee under paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $20.00.
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, the annual registration fee under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is increased by an additional $30.00.]
13–934.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every vehicle used as a vanpool
vehicle is a Class J (vanpool) vehicle.
(b) For each Class J (vanpool) vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $96.50; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $106.50] $76.50.
13–936.
(a) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, including a
passenger vehicle, motorcycle, or truck that:
(1) Is a model year of 1999 or earlier;
(2) Has not been substantially altered from the manufacturer’s original
design; and
(3) Meets criteria contained in regulations adopted by the Administration.
(b) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” does not include a vehicle that has been
remanufactured or reconstructed as a replica of an original vehicle.
(c) If registered with the Administration under this section, every historic motor
vehicle is a Class L (historic) vehicle.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, for each Class L (historic)
vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:

SENATE BILL 896
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $45.50; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $55.50] $25.50.
13–937.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every multipurpose passenger
vehicle is a Class M (multipurpose) vehicle.
(b) For each Class M (multipurpose) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of [3,500] 3,700
pounds or less[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $70.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $80.50], $50.50; AND
(2) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than
[3,500 pounds but not more than] 3,700 pounds[:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $80.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $85.50; and
(3) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,700
pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $121.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $151.50], $76.50.
(c) The Administration may by rule and regulation provide for the registration
under this section of all multipurpose passenger vehicles registered under another
classification.
13–937.1.
(a) In this section, “street rod” means a motor vehicle that:
(1) Is 25 years old or older; and
(2) Has been substantially altered from the manufacturer’s original design.

SENATE BILL 896 11
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, if registered with the
Administration under this section, every street rod is a Class N (street rod) vehicle.
(c) For each Class N (street rod) vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $45.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $55.00] $25.00.
13–939.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every limousine operated for hire
is a Class Q (limousine) vehicle.
(b) For each Class Q (limousine) vehicle, the annual registration fee is[:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $205.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $215.00] $185.00.
(c) On registration of a vehicle under this section, the Administration shall issue
special limousine vehicle registration plates of the size and design that the Administration
determines.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.